Illinois, session 104th, HB1576.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Court of Claims Act is amended by changing 5Sections 6, 9, 13, 21, and 22 as follows: 6    (705 ILCS 505/6)  (from Ch. 37, par. 439.6)7    Sec. 6. The court shall hold sessions at such places or 8remotely as it deems necessary to expedite the business of the 9court.10(Source: P.A. 90-492, eff. 8-17-97.) 11    (705 ILCS 505/9)  (from Ch. 37, par. 439.9)12    Sec. 9. The court may: A. Establish rules for its 13government and for the regulation of practice therein; appoint 14commissioners to assist the court in such manner as it directs 15and discharge them at will; and exercise such powers as are 16necessary to carry into effect the powers granted in this 17Section. Any Commissioner appointed shall be an attorney 18licensed to practice law in the State of Illinois. The rules 19established hereunder shall not be waived, and any extension 20of time authorized by such rules shall only be allowed on 21motion duly filed within the time limitation for which the 22extension is requested.  HB1576 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 06298 JRC 16333 b1    B. Issue subpoenas through the Chief Justice or one of its 2judges or commissioners to require the attendance of witnesses 3for the purpose of testifying before it, or before any judge of 4the court, or before any notary public, or any of its 5commissioners, and to require the production of any books, 6records, papers or documents that may be material or relevant 7as evidence in any matter pending before it. In case any person 8refuses to comply with any subpoena issued in the name of the 9chief justice, or one of the judges or commissioners, attested 10by the clerk, with the seal of the court attached, and served 11upon the person named therein as a summons in a civil action is 12served, the circuit court of the proper county, on application 13of the party at whose instance the subpoena was issued, shall 14compel obedience by attachment proceedings, as for contempt, 15as in a case of a disobedience of the requirements of a 16subpoena from such court on a refusal to testify therein.17    C. The court may adopt administrative rules to provide for 18remote or electronic filing of a claim or other motion, 19participation in any capacity before the court, taking of 20evidence or testimony, conducting any business of the court, 21or payment of any fees to the court. 22(Source: P.A. 83-865.) 23    (705 ILCS 505/13)  (from Ch. 37, par. 439.13)24    Sec. 13. Any judge or commissioner of the court may sit at 25any place within the State or may remotely to take evidence in   HB1576 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 06298 JRC 16333 b1or conduct any case in the court.2(Source: Laws 1945, p. 660.) 3    (705 ILCS 505/21)  (from Ch. 37, par. 439.21)4    Sec. 21. The court is authorized to impose, by uniform 5rules, a fee of $15 for the filing of a petition in any case in 6which the award sought is more than $50 and less than $1,000 7and $35 in any case in which the award sought is $1,000 or 8more; and to charge and collect for copies of opinions or other 9documents filed in the Court of Claims such fees as may be 10prescribed by the rules of the Court. All fees and charges so 11collected shall be forthwith paid into the State Treasury. The 12Court may determine the form and manner of all filing fees and 13other charges due the court by administrative rule. 14    A petitioner who is a prisoner in an Illinois Department 15of Corrections facility who files a pleading, motion, or other 16filing that purports to be a legal document against the State, 17the Illinois Department of Corrections, the Prisoner Review 18Board, or any of their officers or employees in which the court 19makes a specific finding that it is frivolous shall pay all 20filing fees and court costs in the manner provided in Article 21XXII of the Code of Civil Procedure.22    In claims based upon lapsed appropriations or lost warrant 23or in claims filed under the Line of Duty Compensation Act, the 24Illinois National Guardsman's Compensation Act, or the Crime 25Victims Compensation Act or in claims filed by medical vendors   HB1576 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 06298 JRC 16333 b1for medical services rendered by the claimant to persons 2eligible for Medical Assistance under programs administered by 3the Department of Healthcare and Family Services, no filing 4fee shall be required.5(Source: P.A. 95-331, eff. 8-21-07.) 6    (705 ILCS 505/22)  (from Ch. 37, par. 439.22)7    Sec. 22. Every claim cognizable by the court and not 8otherwise sooner barred by law shall be forever barred from 9prosecution therein unless it is filed with the clerk of the 10court within the time set forth as follows: 11        (a) All claims arising out of a contract must be filed 12    within 5 years after it first accrues, saving to minors, 13    and persons under legal disability at the time the claim 14    accrues, in which cases the claim must be filed within 5 15    years from the time the disability ceases. 16        (b) All claims cognizable against the State by vendors 17    of goods or services under the Illinois Public Aid Code 18    must be filed within one year after the accrual of the 19    cause of action, as provided in Section 11-13 of that 20    Code. 21        (c) All claims arising under paragraph (c) of Section 22    8 of this Act must be automatically heard by the court 23    within 120 days after the person asserting such claim is 24    either issued a certificate of innocence from the circuit 25    court as provided in Section 2-702 of the Code of Civil   HB1576 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 06298 JRC 16333 b1    Procedure, or is granted a pardon by the Governor, 2    whichever occurs later, without the person asserting the 3    claim being required to file a petition under Section 11 4    of this Act, except as otherwise provided by the Crime 5    Victims Compensation Act. Any claims filed by the claimant 6    under paragraph (c) of Section 8 of this Act must be filed 7    within 2 years after the person asserting such claim is 8    either issued a certificate of innocence as provided in 9    Section 2-702 of the Code of Civil Procedure, or is 10    granted a pardon by the Governor, whichever occurs later.11        (d) All claims arising under paragraph (f) of Section 12    8 of this Act must be filed within the time set forth in 13    Section 3 of the Line of Duty Compensation Act. 14        (e) All claims arising under paragraph (h) of Section 15    8 of this Act must be filed within one year of the date of 16    the death of the guardsman or militiaman as provided in 17    Section 3 of the Illinois National Guardsman's 18    Compensation Act. 19        (f) All claims arising under paragraph (g) of Section 20    8 of this Act must be filed within 5 years one year of the 21    crime on which a claim is based as provided in Section 6.1 22    of the Crime Victims Compensation Act. 23        (g) All claims arising from the Comptroller's refusal 24    to issue a replacement warrant pursuant to Section 10.10 25    of the State Comptroller Act must be filed within 5 years 26    after the date of the Comptroller's refusal.   HB1576 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 06298 JRC 16333 b1        (h) All other claims must be filed within 2 years 2    after it first accrues, saving to minors, and persons 3    under legal disability at the time the claim accrues, in 4    which case the claim must be filed within 2 years from the 5    time the disability ceases. 6        (i) The changes made by Public Act 86-458 apply to all 7    warrants issued within the 5-year period preceding August 8    31, 1989 (the effective date of Public Act 86-458). The 9    changes made to this Section by Public Act 100-1124 apply 10    to claims pending on November 27, 2018 (the effective date 11    of Public Act 100-1124) and to claims filed thereafter.12        (j) All time limitations established under this Act 13    and the rules promulgated under this Act shall be binding 14    and jurisdictional, except upon extension authorized by 15    law or rule and granted pursuant to a motion timely filed. 16(Source: P.A. 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22.)